Georgia, session 2025_26, HB181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 10 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to vital records,
is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"31-10-13.3.
(a) A child who has automatically acquired United States citizenship following a foreign
adoption and who possesses a Certificate of Citizenship in accordance with the federal
Child Citizenship Act of 2000, P. L. 106-395, 114 Stat. 1631, shall be exempt from the
provisions of Code Section 31-10-13, requiring a report of adoption from a court of
competent jurisdiction in this state to acquire a 'Certificate of Foreign Birth.'
(b) The state registrar, upon written request, shall prepare a 'Certificate of Foreign Birth'
reflecting the actual date and place of birth for a child who was born in a foreign country,
- 1 -

LC 57 0269S
was adopted by a United States citizen, and has automatically acquired citizenship in
accordance with the federal Child Citizenship Act of 2000 upon the production of the
following documents:
(1) The child's Certificate of Citizenship;
(2) The social security card of the child;
(3) A valid government issued form of identification possessing a picture of the parent
or parents, such as a passport or driver's license; and
(4) Proof of residency of the parent or parents in the State of Georgia.
(c) The state registrar shall develop any necessary forms for adoptive parents to submit in
order to request a 'Certificate of Foreign Birth.'"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 2 -